Utah statutes.
48-2e-1131.   Interest exchange authorized.

(1)  By complying with Sections 48-2e-1131 through 48-2e-1136:

(a)  a domestic limited partnership may acquire all of one or more classes or series of interests of another domestic or foreign entity in exchange for interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing; or

(b)  all of one or more classes or series of interests of a domestic limited partnership may be acquired by another domestic or foreign entity in exchange for interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire interests or securities, money, or other property, or any combination of the foregoing.

(2)  By complying with the provisions of Sections 48-2e-1131 through 48-2e-1136 applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity may be the acquiring or acquired entity in an interest exchange under Sections 48-2e-1131 through 48-2e-1136 if the interest exchange is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

(3)  If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic limited partnership but does not refer to an interest exchange, the provision applies to an interest exchange in which the domestic limited partnership is the acquired entity as if the interest exchange were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2014.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

